tables/da-dk-g28_93.ctb
# Ensure that we have letsign between a digit and "st"
# and nd after a digit is not contracted
noback context _$d["st"]!$l @6-234-2345
noback context _$d["st"]~ @6-234-2345
noback context _$d["nd"]!$l @1345-145
noback context _$d["nd"]~ @1345-145
# The following lines are to ensure that we get a letsign between a digit and a single letter.
noback context $d[]$l!$l @6
noback context $d[]$l~ @6

### Correct - Forward translation

# Ensure that capsnocont does not stretch across dashes
noback correct $U["-"] "\xf8fe"

# Special characters that always need letsigns because they represent contractions
always \x00a1 6-256 # inverted exclamationmark

#Special sequences, urls emails and file names.
nocont $
nocont \\ # line cannot end with a backslash
nocont @
nocont ://
nocont www
nocont .com
nocont .dk
nocont .eu
nocont .edu
nocont .gov
nocont .mil
nocont .net
nocont .org
nocont .uk
nocont .doc
nocont .exe
nocont .htm
nocont .tex
nocont .txt
nocont .gif
nocont .jpg
nocont .png
nocont .wav
nocont .tar
nocont .zip

#Words
word af 356
word aldrig 1-35
word aig =
word alle 1-15
begnum ae 6-1-15
contraction ae
word allerede 1-123-1235
begnum alr 6-1-123-1235
contraction alr
word alligevel 1-123-1236
begnum alv 6-1-123-1236
contraction alv
word altid 1-2345-145
begnum atd 6-1-2345-145
contraction atd
word altså 1-16
begnum aå 6-1-16
contraction aå
word at 1

word blevet 12-2345
begnum bt 6-12-2345
contraction bt
word blev 12-1236
begnum bv 6-12-1236
contraction bv
word blive 12-3456
word bve 12-1236-15
word bliver 12

word derefter 23456-1356
word derst =
word deres 256
word derfor 23456-124
word derf =
word derigennem 23456-24-12456
word derige 1456-1235-24-12456
word dermed 23456-134
word derm =
word derned 23456-1246
word derne =
word derop 23456-135
word dero =
word derover 23456-1346
word deror =
word derpå 23456-1234
word derp =
word dersom 23456-234
word ders =
word dertil 23456-2345
word dert =
word derunder 23456-12345
word derved 23456-1236
word din 145-1345
begnum dn 6-145-1345
contraction dn
word disse 145-234
begnum ds 6-145-234
contraction ds
word dit 145-2345
begnum dt 6-145-2345
contraction dt
word du 145

word efter 1356
word eller 15
word endnu 15-136
begnum eu 6-15-136
contraction eu

word fik 124-13
begnum fk 6-124-13
contraction fk
word fordi 124-145
begnum fd 6-124-145
contraction fd
word forskellige 124-123456-15
word fske =
word forskelligt 124-123456-2345
word fskt =
word forskellig 124-123456
word fsk =
word for 124
word fra 235
word første 124-1356-15
word først 124-1356
word før 246

word ganske 1245-123456
word gennem 12456
word ge =
word gik 1245-13
begnum gk 6-1245-13
contraction gk
word gør 1245

word ham 236
word hans 13456-234
begnum ys 6-13456-234
contraction ys
word han 13456
word har 125
word havde 125-1456
word hde =
word have 125-3456
word hve =
word helt 125-2345
begnum ht 6-125-2345
contraction ht
word hendes 125-234
begnum hs 6-125-234
contraction hs
word hende 125-145
begnum hd 6-125-145
contraction hd
word hun 136
word hvad 2456
word hv =
word hvis 2456-234
word hvs =
word hvordan 34-1
word hvora 34-6-1
word hvorefter 34-1356
word hvorst 34-234-2345
word hvorfor 34-124
word hvorf 34-6-124
word hvorigennem 34-24-12456
word hvorledes 34-15
word hvore 34-6-15
word hvormed 34-134
word hvorm 34-6-134
word hvornår 34-1345
word hvorn 34-6-1345
word hvorover 34-1346
word hvoror 34-135-1235
word hvorpå 34-1234
word hvorp 34-6-1234
word hvortil 34-2345
word hvort 34-6-2345
word hvorunder 34-12345
word hvornd 34-1345-145
word hvorved 34-1236
word hvorv 34-6-1236
word hvor 34

word igennem 24-12456
word ige =
word igen 35
word ig =
word ikke 24-13
begnum ik 6-24-13
contraction ik
word imidlertid 24-24
begnum ii 6-24-24
contraction ii

word jeg 245

word kan 13
word kommer 13-156
word ker =
word kommet 13-346
word ket =
word komme 13-146
word kme =
word kom 13-134
begnum km 6-13-134
contraction km
word kunne 13-1246
word kne =

word ligesom 123-234
begnum ls 6-123-234
contraction ls
word lige 123
word lille 123-123
begnum ll 6-123-123
contraction ll

word mange 134-12456
word mge =
word med 134
word megen 146-126
word meen =
word meget 146-346
word meet =
word mellem 146-134
word mem =
word men 146
word me =
word min 134-1345
begnum mn 6-134-1345
contraction mn
word mit 134-2345
begnum mt 6-145-2345
contraction mt
word måske 134-123456
word msk =
word måtte 134-1256
word mte =

word naturligvis 1345-2345-1236
begnum ntv 6-1345-2345-1236
contraction ntv
word nd =
word ned 1246
word ne =
word nogen 1345-1345
begnum nn 6-1345-1345
contraction nn
word noget 1345-2345
begnum nt 6-1345-2345
contraction nt
word nogle 1345-123-15
begnum nle 6-1345-123-15
contraction nle
word når 1345

word også 14-16
begnum cå 6-14-16
contraction cå
word og 14
word omkring 135-134-13
begnum omk 6-135-134-13
contraction omk
word op 135
word or =
word over 1346

word på 1234

word ret 12356
word re 1235-15
word rigtige 1235-12456
word rge =
word rigtigt 1235-2345
begnum rt 6-1235-2345
contraction rt
word rigtig 1235

word sagde 234-1456
word sammen 234-134
begnum sm 6-234-134
contraction sm
word samme 234-146
word sme =
word selvfølgelig 234-1236-124
begnum svf 6-234-1236-124
contraction svf
word selv 234-1236
begnum sv 6-234-1236
contraction sv
word sidste 234-1356-15
word sste =
word sidst 234-1356
word sst =
word sin 234-1345
begnum sn 6-234-1345
contraction sn
word sit 234-2345
begnum st 6-234-2345
contraction st
word skal 123456
word sk =
word skulle 123456-123-15
word skle =
word snart 234-1235
begnum sr 6-234-1235
contraction sr
word som 234
word sådan 16-1
begnum åa 6-16-1
contraction åa
word således 16-15
begnum åe 6-16-15
contraction åe
word så 16

word te 1256
word tid 2345-145
begnum td 6-2345-145
contraction td
word tilbage 2345-12
begnum tb 6-2345-12
contraction tb
word til 2345

word under 12345

word var- =
word var. =
word var 36
word ve 3456
word ved 1236
word ville 1236-123-15
begnum vle 6-1236-123-15
contraction vle
word vil 1236-123
begnum vl 6-1236-123
contraction vl
word været 1236-2345
begnum vt 6-1236-2345
contraction vt
word være 345

#Part words
nocross always den 12346
nocross always der 23456
nocross always det 2346
nocross always de 1456
nocross always en 126
nocross always er 156
nocross always et 346
nocross always ge 12456
nocross always hvor 34
nocross always hv 2456
nocross always ig 35
nocross always me 146
nocross always nd 12345
nocross always ne 1246
nocross always or 1346
nocross always re 12356
nocross always sk 123456
nocross always st 1356
nocross always te 1256
nocross always ve 3456

#special cases with dropped signs
# which can be both punctuations and contractions.

always fra! 124-1235-1-235
always !fra 235-124-1235-1
always !! 235-235
always !!! 235-235-235
always "fra" 2356-124-1235-1-2356
after punctuation always ! 6-235
always 'af 4-1-124

always \s! 0-6-235
prepunc ! 6-235
nofor always ! 6-235
noback context `["!"] @6-235


# Ensure no one-letter word contraction before or after a dash

prfword -af 368-1-124
sufword af- 1-124-368
prfword -at 368-1-2345
sufword at- 1-2345-368
prfword -deres 368-1456-12356-234
sufword deres- 1456-12356-234-368
prfword -du 368-145-136
sufword du- 145-136-368
prfword -efter 368-15-124-2345-156
sufword efter- 15-124-2345-156-368
prfword -for 368-124-1346
sufword for- 124-1346-368
prfword -fra 368-124-1235-1
sufword fra- 124-1235-1-368
prfword -gennem 368-1245-126-1246-134
sufword gennem- 1245-126-1246-134-368
prfword -ham 368-125-1-134
sufword ham- 125-1-134-368
prfword -han 368-125-1-1345
sufword han- 125-1-1345-368
prfword -har 368-125-1-1235
sufword har- 125-1-1235-368
prfword -hun 368-125-136-1345
sufword hun- 125-136-1345-368
prfword -kan 368-13-1-1345
sufword kan- 13-1-1345-368
prfword -lige 368-123-24-12456
sufword lige- 123-24-12456-368
prfword -med 368-146-145
sufword med- 146-145-368
prfword -men 368-134-126
sufword men- 134-126-368
prfword -ned 368-1246-145
sufword ned- 1246-145-368
prfword -når 368-1345-16-1235
sufword når- 1345-16-1235-368
prfword -og 368-135-1245
sufword og- 135-1245-368
prfword -op 368-135-1234
sufword op- 135-1234-368
prfword -over 368-135-1236-156
sufword over- 135-1236-156-368
prfword -på 368-1234-16
sufword på- 1234-16-368
prfword -ret 368-1235-346
sufword ret- 1235-346-368
prfword -rigtig 368-1235-35-2345-35
sufword rigtig- 1235-35-2345-35-368
prfword -skal 368-123456-1-123
sufword skal- 123456-1-123-368
prfword -som 368-234-135-134
sufword som- 234-135-134-368
prfword -så 368-234-16
sufword så- 234-16-368
prfword -til 368-2345-24-123
sufword til- 2345-24-123-368
prfword -under 368-136-1345-23456
sufword under- 136-1345-23456-368
prfword -ved 368-1236-15-145
sufword ved- 1236-15-145-368
prfword -være 368-1236-345-12356
sufword være- 1236-345-12356-368

# *** patches for various Liblouis bugs
# this file will be removed when the bugs are fixed

nofor always a 6-1
nofor always b 6-12
nofor always c 6-14
nofor always d 6-145
nofor always e 6-15
nofor always f 6-124
nofor always g 6-1245
nofor always h 6-125
nofor always j 6-245
nofor always k 6-13
nofor always l 6-123
nofor always m 6-134
nofor always n 6-1345
nofor always o 6-135
nofor always p 6-1234
nofor always q 6-12345
nofor always r 6-1235
nofor always s 6-234
nofor always t 6-2345
nofor always u 6-136
nofor always v 6-1236
nofor always w 6-2456
nofor always x 6-1346
nofor always y 6-13456
nofor always z 6-1356
nofor always æ 6-345
nofor always ø 6-246
nofor always å 6-16

nofor always A 6-17
nofor always B 6-127
nofor always C 6-147
nofor always D 6-1457
nofor always E 6-157
nofor always F 6-1247
nofor always G 6-12457
nofor always H 6-1257
nofor always J 6-2457
nofor always K 6-137
nofor always L 6-1237
nofor always M 6-1347
nofor always N 6-13457
nofor always O 6-1357
nofor always P 6-12347
nofor always Q 6-123457
nofor always R 6-12357
nofor always S 6-2347
nofor always T 6-23457
nofor always U 6-1367
nofor always V 6-12367
nofor always W 6-24567
nofor always X 6-13467
nofor always Y 6-134567
nofor always Z 6-13567
nofor always Æ 6-3457
nofor always Ø 6-2467
nofor always Å 6-167

# if a word contraction is followed by a punctuation and another word immediately after,
# The contracted word before the punctuation will back-translate as its components
attribute wordlimit /,!.:’()?"'\x00ab_\x201d\x0094\x2019\x0092\x00bb
nofor before wordlimit begword af 356
nofor before wordlimit begword aldrig 1-35
nofor before wordlimit begword aig =
nofor before wordlimit begword alle 1-15
nofor before wordlimit begword allerede 1-123-1235
nofor before wordlimit begword alligevel 1-123-1236
nofor before wordlimit begword altid 1-2345-145
nofor before wordlimit begword altså 1-16
nofor before wordlimit begword at 1

nofor before wordlimit begword blevet 12-2345
nofor before wordlimit begword blev 12-1236
nofor before wordlimit begword blive 12-3456
nofor before wordlimit begword bve 12-1236-15
nofor before wordlimit begword bliver 12
